Washington statutes.
RCW 43.42.901

Authority of permit agencies not affected.

(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abrogate or diminish the functions, powers, or duties granted to any permit agency by law.

(2) Nothing in this chapter grants the office authority to decide if a permit shall be issued. The authority for determining if a permit shall be issued shall remain with the permit agency.

[ 2002 c 153 s 12.]